New Mexico, session 2026, HB236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the university of New Mexico health sciences center's "pathways statewide collaborative" program to support health professional pathway programs, including science, technology, engineering, math and health sciences programs and youth leadership development activities. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -